Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 124.204, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraphs: NEW PARAGRAPH . cq. 2-methyl-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4- yl)-N-phenylbutanamide. Other name: alphaâ-Methyl butyryl fentanyl. NEW PARAGRAPH . cr. N-(1-(2,5- dimethoxyphenethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpropionamide. Other name: 2â,5â-Dimethoxyfentanyl. House File 182, p. 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . cs. N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N- phenylfuran-3-carboxamide. Other name: 3-Furanyl fentanyl. NEW PARAGRAPH . ct. 3-methyl-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4- yl)-N-phenylbutanamide. Other name: Isovaleryl fentanyl. NEW PARAGRAPH . cu. N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1- phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide. Other name: meta- Fluorofentanyl. NEW PARAGRAPH . cv. N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1- phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide. Other name: meta- Fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl. NEW PARAGRAPH . cw. N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1- phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide. Other name: ortho-Fluorofuranyl fentanyl. NEW PARAGRAPH . cx. N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1- phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide. Other name: para-Methoxyfuranyl fentanyl. NEW PARAGRAPH . cy. N-(4-methylphenyl)-N-(1- phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)cyclopropanecarboxamide. Other name: para-Methylcyclopropyl fentanyl. NEW PARAGRAPH . cz. 1-(2-methyl-4-(3-phenylprop-2-en-1- yl)piperazin-1-yl)butan-1-one. Other name: 2-Methyl AP-237. NEW PARAGRAPH . da. 2-(2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-1H- benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine. Other names: etodesnitazene; etazene. NEW PARAGRAPH . db. 2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1-(2- (pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1H-benzimidazole. Other names: N- pyrrolidino etonitazene; etonitazepyne. NEW PARAGRAPH . dc. N,N-diethyl-2-(5-nitro-2-(4- propoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine. Other name: protonitazene. Sec. 2. Section 124.204, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraphs: NEW PARAGRAPH . cn. N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1- oxobutan-2-yl)-1-butyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide. Other name: ADB-BUTINACA. NEW PARAGRAPH . co. 4-methyl-1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1- yl)pentan-1-one. Other name: alpha-PiHP. NEW PARAGRAPH . cp. 2-(methylamino)-1-(3- methylphenyl)propan-1-one. Other names: 3-MMC; 3- House File 182, p. 3 methylmethcathinone. Sec. 3. Section 124.204, subsection 9, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraphs: NEW PARAGRAPH . o. Methyl 3,3-dimethyl-2-(1-(pent-4-en- 1-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)butanoate. Other name: MDMB-4en-PINACA. NEW PARAGRAPH . p. Methyl 2-[[1-(4-fluorobutyl)indole- 3-carbonyl]amino]-3,3-dimethyl-butanoate. Other names: 4F-MDMB-BUTICA; 4F-MDMB-BICA. NEW PARAGRAPH . q. N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan- 2-yl)-1-(pent-4-en-1-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide. Other name: ADB-4en-PINACA. NEW PARAGRAPH . r. 5-Pentyl-2-(2-phenylpropan-2- yl)pyrido[4,3-b]indol-1-one. Other names: CUMYL-PEGACLONE; SGT-151. NEW PARAGRAPH . s. Ethyl 2-[[1-(5-fluoropentyl)indole- 3-carbonyl]amino]-3,3-dimethyl-butanoate. Other names: 5F-EDMB-PICA; 5F-EDMB-2201. NEW PARAGRAPH . t. Methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H- indole-3-carboxamido)-3-methyl butanoate. Other name: MMB- FUBICA. NEW PARAGRAPH . u. N-ethyl-2-(2-(4-isopropoxybenzyl)-5- nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine, its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers. Other name: N-desethyl isotonitazene. NEW PARAGRAPH . v. 2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1-(2- piperidin-1-yl)-1H-benzimidazole, its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers. Other names: N-piperidinyl etonitazene; etonitazepipne. Sec. 4. Section 124.204, subsection 9, paragraphs d, h, and i, Code 2025, are amended by striking the paragraphs. Sec. 5. Section 124.208, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraphs: NEW PARAGRAPH . bm. 5[alpha]-androstan-3,6,17-trione. NEW PARAGRAPH . bn. 6-bromo-androsta-1,4-diene-3,17- dione. NEW PARAGRAPH . bo. 6-bromo-androstan-3,17-dione. NEW PARAGRAPH . bp. 4-chloro-17[alpha]-methyl-androsta- 1,4-diene-3,17[beta]-diol. House File 182, p. 4 NEW PARAGRAPH . bq. 4-chloro-17[alpha]-methyl-androst- 4-ene-3[beta],17[beta]-diol. NEW PARAGRAPH . br. 4-chloro-17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- hydroxy-androst-4-en-3-one. NEW PARAGRAPH . bs. 4-chloro-17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- hydroxy-androst-4-ene-3,11-dione. NEW PARAGRAPH . bt. 2[alpha],17[alpha]-dimethyl- 17[beta]-hydroxy-5[beta]-androstan-3-one. NEW PARAGRAPH . bu. 2[alpha],3[alpha]-epithio- 17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]-androstan-17[beta]-ol. NEW PARAGRAPH . bv. estra-4,9,11-triene-3,17-dione. NEW PARAGRAPH . bw. [3,2-c]furazan-5[alpha]-androstan- 17[beta]-ol. NEW PARAGRAPH . bx. 18a-homo-3-hydroxy-estra-2,5(10)- dien-17-one. NEW PARAGRAPH . by. 4-hydroxy-androst-4-ene-3,17-dione. NEW PARAGRAPH . bz. 17[beta]-hydroxy-androstano[2,3- d]isoxazole. NEW PARAGRAPH . ca. 17[beta]-hydroxy-androstano[3,2- c]isoxazole. NEW PARAGRAPH . cb. 3[beta]-hydroxy-estra-4,9,11-trien- 17-one. NEW PARAGRAPH . cc. 17[alpha]-methyl-androsta-1,4- diene-3,17[beta]-diol. NEW PARAGRAPH . cd. 17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]- androstan-17[beta]-ol. NEW PARAGRAPH . ce. 17[alpha]-methyl-androstan-3- hydroxyimine-17[beta]-ol. NEW PARAGRAPH . cf. 6[alpha]-methyl-androst-4-ene-3,17- dione. NEW PARAGRAPH . cg. 17[alpha]-methyl-androst-2-ene- 3,17[beta]-diol. NEW PARAGRAPH . ch. [3,2-c]pyrazole-androst-4-en- 17[beta]-ol. Sec. 6. Section 124.208, subsection 6, paragraphs a, h, v, z, aa, am, ay, ba, bb, bc, bk, and bl, Code 2025, are amended by striking the paragraphs and inserting in lieu thereof the following: a. 3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxy-5[alpha]-androstane. House File 182, p. 5 h. 1-androstenedione (5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3,17-dione). v. Furazabol (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]furazan). z. Mestanolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]- androstan-3-one). aa. Mesterolone (1[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]- androstan-3-one). am. 17[alpha]-methyl-[Delta]1-dihydrotestosterone (17[beta]-hydroxy-17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one) (also known as 17-[alpha]-methyl-1-testosterone). ay. Oxandrolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-2-oxa- 5[alpha]-androstan-3-one). ba. Oxymetholone (17[alpha]-methyl-2-hydroxymethylene- 17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-androstan-3-one). bb. Stanozolol (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha] -androst-2-eno[3,2-c]-pyrazole). bc. Stenbolone (17[beta]-hydroxy-2-methyl-5[alpha]-androst- 1-en-3-one). bk. Methasterone (2[alpha],17[alpha]-dimethyl-5[alpha] -androstan-17[beta]-ol-3-one or 2[alpha],17[alpha]-dimethyl- 17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-androstan-3-one). bl. Prostanozol (17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-androstano[3,2- c]pyrazole or [3,2-c]pyrazole-5[alpha]-androstan-17[beta]-ol). Sec. 7. Section 124.210, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . bh. Zuranolone. Sec. 8. Section 124B.2, subsection 1, paragraphs y and ad, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: y. Iodine in concentrations greater than 2.2 percent . ad. N-phenylpiperidin-4-amine(4-anilinopiperidine; N-phenyl-4-piperidinamine; 4-AP), its amides, its carbamates, and its halides, its salts , and any combination thereof, whenever the existence of such is possible . Sec. 9. Section 124B.6, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 5. A sale, transfer, furnishing, or receipt of a chemical mixture identified as exempt by federal regulation. House File 182, p. 6 Sec. 10. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 182, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor